Utah statutes.
63G-6a-1602.   Protest -- Time -- Authority to resolve protest.

(1) Except as provided in Subsection (2), a person who is an actual or prospective bidder, offeror, or contractor who is aggrieved in connection with a procurement or award of a contract may protest to the protest officer as follows:

(a)  with respect to an invitation for bids or a request for proposals:

(i)  before the opening of bids or the closing date for proposals; or

(ii)  if the person did not know and should not have known of the facts giving rise to the protest before the bid opening or the closing date for proposals, within seven days after the day on which the person knows or should have known of the facts giving rise to the protest; or

(b)  if Subsection (1)(a) does not apply, within seven days after the day on which the person knows or should have known of the facts giving rise to the protest.

(2)  A person who is debarred or suspended under this chapter may protest the debarment or suspension to the protest officer that ordered the debarment, as applicable, within seven days after the day on which the debarment or suspension is ordered.

(3)  A person who files a protest under this section shall include in the filing document:

(a) the person's address of record and email address of record; and

(b)  a concise statement of the grounds upon which the protest is made.

(4)  A person described in Subsection (1), (2), or (3) who fails to timely file a protest under this section may not bring a protest, action, or appeal challenging a solicitation or award of a contract, or a debarment or suspension, before the protest officer, an appeals panel, a court, or any other forum.

(5)  Subject to the applicable requirements of Section 63G-10-403, a protest officer, or the protest officer's designee, may enter into a settlement agreement to resolve a protest.



Amended by Chapter 91, 2012 General Session 

Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 347, 2012 General Session 

Amended by Chapter 347, 2012 General Session, (Coordination Clause)

